uz.aff
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inadiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigannida . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangami . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangada . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandami . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandada . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarnida . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlarniku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargami . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargadir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargada . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlargaku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardanmi . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardandir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardanda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 inmaydiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigannida . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangami . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangada . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandami . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandada . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlarniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargami . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargada . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlargaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishadiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigannida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarnida . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlarniku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlargaku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardanmi . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardandir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardanda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 ishmaydiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 diradigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 diradigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 diradigannida . 
SFX Y 0 diradigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangami . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangada . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandami . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandada . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarnida . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlarniku . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargami . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargadir . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargada . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargadirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargamikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlargaku . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardanmi . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardandir . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardanda . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 diradiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigannida . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarnida . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarnidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarnimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlarniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlargaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardami . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardada . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirmaydiganlardaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigannimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigannidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigannida . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigannidirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigannimikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradiganniku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigangaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandanmi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandandir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandanda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandandirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandanmikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandanku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandami . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandadir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandada . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandadirda . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandamikan . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradigandaku . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradiganlarnimi . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradiganlarnidir . 
SFX Y 0 dirtiradiganlarnida . 
