uz.dic
abjirlan/Y
avralat/Y
ag’dartir/Y
ayeqat/Y
ajraltir/Y
azotlan/Y
ayirboshlan/Y
aylantir/Y
ayrimlash/Y
ayttiril/Y
alaxsit/Y
aljirat/Y
almashin/Y
amallash/Y
anglash/Y
aniqlash/Y
arabchalashtir/Y
arzonlash/Y
arqonlat/Y
artish/Y
arch/Y
asran/Y
asfaltlattir/Y
afgorlan/Y
achin/Y
achchig’lan/Y
bag’ishlanil/Y
badirlash/Y
bajarish/Y
bayramlash/Y
balanslan/Y
bardamlan/Y
basitlan/Y
baxillash/Y
bahslashtir/Y
begonalash/Y
bezal/Y
bezattiril/Y
bezillash/Y
bekinish/Y
bemadorlan/Y
ber/Y
betinchlan/Y
behushlantir/Y
biqtiril/Y
bilintiril/Y
birlashish/Y
bichirtir/Y
boqish/Y
boplat/Y
botinmoq/Y
boshlan/Y
bo’g’ishtir/Y
bo’jraytir/Y
bo’zraytir/Y
buklantir/Y
bulattir/Y
bo’l/Y
burjualash/Y
bo’rovlan/Y
bo’tal/Y
bo’shan/Y
buyurt/Y
vadirlat/Y
vangillat/Y
ventilyatsiyalan/Y
voshillat/Y
gangrat/Y
garangsit/Y
giy/Y
guvullat/Y
gungalaklan/Y
davolat/Y
dakirlat/Y
daraklat/Y
da’volash/Y
depsip/Y
dildirash/Y
diffuziyalan/Y
drenajlan/Y
do’lan/Y
duragaylan/Y
yevor/Y
yog’lan/Y
yednrgiz/Y
yoyil/Y
yoqtirg’iz/Y
yolqinlan/Y
yemoq-ich/Y
yondiril/Y
yordamlash/Y
yostan/Y
yetkizdir/Y
yechintiril/Y
jabrlan/Y
jangirlat/Y
jiddiylan/Y
jildlat/Y
jirnllash/Y
juvurlat/Y
jur’atlantir/Y
zanginlash/Y
zaharlan/Y
zipillat/Y
zoriqtir/Y
ivitil/Y
izlattir/Y
yig’/Y
iiriklan/Y
ikkilan/Y
ildamlash/Y
ilit/Y
ingrat/Y
in/Y
ipaklash/Y
yrttirgiz/Y
isn/Y
itqittir/Y
yo’lat/Y
yo’rttir/Y
ihotalan/Y
isharil/Y
ishonish/Y
kayfsizlan/Y
kamayt/Y
karyallash/Y
kez/Y
keltirgiz/Y
keriltir/Y
ketkazdir/Y
kechkirtir/Y
kiyin/Y
kirittnr/Y
kichrayt/Y
kokslan/Y
kosiblash/Y
kuy/Y
ko’mdir/Y
ko’pay/Y
kurat/Y
kurmaklat/Y
kutkilan/Y
ko’ch/Y
qabullat/Y
qadrdonlash/Y
qayirish/Y
qaytaqilan/Y
qaqrat/Y
qalqit/Y
qang’sit/Y
qaran/Y
qarchillat/Y
qatnash/Y
qashlat/Y
qizg’inlashtir/Y
qiyishish/Y
qiyratil/Y
qil/Y
qimsin/Y
qir/Y
qisqar/Y
qichittir/Y
qovzantir/Y
qo’zg’at/Y
qo’msash/Y
quraylash/Y
qo’rqish/Y
qutqazish/Y
qo’shish/Y
laqablan/Y
liqqoqlan/Y
loylash/Y
magnitlantiril/Y
maydalat/Y
maqtan/Y
mashinalashtiril/Y
metrlashtir/Y
milliylash/Y
minerallash/Y
moylat/Y
mubhamlash/Y
muzlatil/Y
mulzamlap/Y
mo’rtlash/Y
mo’tadillashtir/Y
natijalan/Y
nikellan/Y
noziklan/Y
no’qish/Y
obodonlashtir/Y
ovuntirish/Y
og’rintir/Y
ozaytir/Y
oqar/Y
oq/Y
oldinlash/Y
ol/Y
omonlash/Y
orqalan/Y
os/Y
ohorlat/Y
oshattir/Y
pallalan/Y
pasaytiril/Y
piqirlash/Y
pishillash/Y
poylattir/Y
po’klan/Y
pshshklan/Y
rayonlashtiril/Y
revolyutsionlashtir/Y
ruschalash/Y
sazattir/Y
salomlash/Y
sapchish/Y
saxiylash/Y
sekinlash/Y
seroblash/Y
sidirtir/Y
siyraklashtir/Y
singdirtir/Y
sirachlan/Y
sihatlan/Y
sog’in/Y
solintir/Y
sochil/Y
sug’or/Y
suzil/Y
so’kintir/Y
so’ljay/Y
so’ral/Y
surintir/Y
surtin/Y
so’yul/Y
tabaqalan/Y
taiyorlash/Y
taktaklat/Y
taqqoslat/Y
tambalat/Y
tanishtir/Y
taraqlat/Y
tarvaytir/Y
taxlat/Y
tashlan/Y
tvdash/Y
tejattir/Y
tekshirish/Y
tepkilan/Y
terlat/Y
tizginlan/Y
tikish/Y
tiqiltir/Y
tilkalash/Y
tiniqlan/Y
tipiklashtiril/Y
tiril/Y
tirsaklash/Y
titkilash/Y
toblash/Y
toylan/Y
tomdir/Y
top/Y
tortil/Y
toshtirg’iz/Y
to’g’rat/Y
tuzattir/Y
tuzuklash/Y
to’kislan/Y
to’qmoqlan/Y
to’lg’an/Y
to’l/Y
to’nkartir/Y
to’porilash/Y
turmuchlan/Y
to’stir/Y
tutqilash/Y
tushkunlash/Y
uval/Y
o’girtir/Y
uzattnr/Y
o’zlashtiril/Y
uyg’unlash/Y
o’ylat/Y
o’kin/Y
o’qish/Y
ulash/Y
o’ltirg’iz/Y
o’ng’aysizlan/Y
o’nut/Y
o’raltir/Y
o’rdirtir/Y
o’rlash/Y
urtoqlash/Y
o’tal/Y
utkizil/Y
o’tlash/Y
o’xshal/Y
uchqunlan/Y
ushal/Y
uyalat/Y
federativlashtir/Y
xastalan/Y
xinalat/Y
xloritlash/Y
xotirlan/Y
xo’rillat/Y
xo’shshay/Y
chayin/Y
chaynash/Y
chaqmoqlat/Y
chalishtir/Y
changitish/Y
charaqlash/Y
chatoqlashtir/Y
cheklan/Y
chechaklan/Y
chizilish/Y
chiqazil/Y
chilpin/Y
chirillat/Y
chirpirat/Y
chopishtir/Y
chuvatil/Y
chug’urlat/Y
cho’kichlan/Y
cho’qqay/Y
cho’mdir/Y
cho’tlash/Y
shabadalat/Y
shaqirlash/Y
shapaloqlash/Y
shivirlash/Y
shilqimlan/Y
shing’illat/Y
shitirlat/Y
shovurlash/Y
shoshirish/Y
sho’ko’hlan/Y
ebortir/Y
egarlattir/Y
egurtil/Y
ezlashtiril/Y
eklattir/Y
eqorilash/Y
elattir/Y
elit/Y
eltanglan/Y
emashtir/Y
emlat/Y
eplash/Y
er/Y
etil/Y
yumshar/Y
yurdir/Y
yaqinlash/Y
yaral/Y
yasan/Y
yaxlitlashtir/Y
